North Carolina, session 2025, HB1181.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 105-277.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a3) Spousal Income Limitation. – Married applicants residing with their spouses may
qualify for the property tax homestead exclusion provided in this section if their income does not
exceed one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the income eligibility limit determined under
subsection (a2) of this section."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 105-277.1B reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1B. Property tax homestead circuit breaker.
(a) Classification. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner
is designated a special class of property under Article V, Section 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section.
(b) Definitions. – The definitions provided in G.S. 105-277.1 apply to this section.
(c) Income Eligibility Limit. – The income eligibility limit provided in
G.S. 105-277.1(a2) applies to this section.
(c1) AMI Limit. – Seventy percent (70%) of the area median income for a household of
two persons in the county in which the property is located, as determined by the most recent
figure reported by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development as of
January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the benefit is claimed.
(d) Qualifying Owner. – For the purpose of qualifying for the property tax homestead
circuit breaker under this section, a qualifying owner is an owner who meets all of the following
requirements as of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the benefit is claimed:
(1) The owner has an income for the preceding calendar year of not more than
one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the income eligibility limit specified
*H1181-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
maximum amount authorized in subsection (c) subsection (f) or (f1) of this
section.section, as applicable.
(2) The owner has owned and occupied the property as a permanent residence for
at least five consecutive years and has occupied the property as a permanent
residence for at least five years.the required amount of time under subsection
(f) or (f1) of this section, as applicable.
(3) The owner is at least 65 years of age or totally and permanently disabled.
(4) The owner is a North Carolina resident.
(e) Multiple Owners. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by husband and wife
is entitled to the full benefit of the property tax homestead circuit breaker notwithstanding that
only one of them meets the length of occupancy and ownership requirements and the age or
disability requirement of this section. When a permanent residence is owned and occupied by
two or more persons other than husband and wife, no property tax homestead circuit breaker is
allowed unless all of the owners qualify and elect to defer taxes under this section.qualify.
(f) General Tax Limitation. – A qualifying owner may defer that has owned the property
as a permanent residence for at least five consecutive years and has occupied the property as a
permanent residence for at least five years is relieved of the portion of the principal amount of
tax that is imposed for the current tax year on his or her permanent residence and exceeds the
percentage of the qualifying owner's income set out in the table in this subsection. If a permanent
residence is subject to tax by more than one taxing unit and the total tax liability exceeds the tax
limit imposed by this section, then both the taxes due under this section and the taxes deferred
under this section must be apportioned among the taxing units based upon the ratio each taxing
unit's tax rate bears to the total tax rate of all units.
Income Over Income Up To Percentage
-0- Income Eligibility Limit 4.0%
Income Eligibility Limit 150% of Income Eligibility Limit 5.0%
(f1) Alternate Tax Limitation. – A qualifying owner that has owned the property as a
permanent residence for at least 10 consecutive years and has occupied the property as a
permanent residence for at least 10 years is relieved of the portion of the principal amount of tax
that is imposed for the current tax year on his or her permanent residence and exceeds the
percentage of the qualifying owner's income set out in the table in this subsection. If a permanent
residence is subject to tax by more than one taxing unit and the total tax liability exceeds the tax
limit imposed by this section, then the taxes due under this section must be apportioned among
the taxing units based upon the ratio each taxing unit's tax rate bears to the total tax rate of all
units. If the AMI Limit is less than or equal to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the Income
Eligibility Limit, a qualifying owner shall receive the benefit under subsection (f) of this section.
Income Over Income Up To Percentage
150% of Income Eligibility Limit AMI Limit 6.0%
(g) Temporary Absence. – An otherwise qualifying owner does not lose the benefit of
this circuit breaker because of a temporary absence from his or her permanent residence for
reasons of health, or because of an extended absence while confined to a rest home or nursing
home, so long as the residence is unoccupied or occupied by the owner's spouse or other
dependent.
(h) Deferred Taxes. – The difference between the taxes due under this section and the
taxes that would have been payable in the absence of this section are a lien on the real property
of the taxpayer as provided in G.S. 105-355(a). The difference in taxes must be carried forward
in the records of each taxing unit as deferred taxes. The deferred taxes for the preceding three
fiscal years are due and payable in accordance with G.S. 105-277.1F when the property loses its
eligibility for deferral as a result of a disqualifying event described in subsection (i) of this
section. On or before September 1 of each year, the collector must send to the mailing address of
Page 2 House Bill 1181-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a residence on which taxes have been deferred a notice stating the amount of deferred taxes and
interest that would be due and payable upon the occurrence of a disqualifying event.
(i) Disqualifying Events. – A property receiving the benefit under this section loses its
eligibility for the benefit as a result of a disqualifying event. The tax for the fiscal year that begins
in the calendar year in which the disqualifying event occurs is computed as if the property had
not been classified for the property tax benefit under this section for that year. Each of the
following constitutes a disqualifying event:
(1) The owner transfers the residence. Transfer of the residence is not a
disqualifying event if (i) the owner transfers the residence to a co-owner of
the residence or, as part of a divorce proceeding, to his or her spouse and (ii)
that individual occupies or continues to occupy the property as his or her
permanent residence.
(2) The owner dies. Death of the owner is not a disqualifying event if (i) the
owner's share passes to a co-owner of the residence or to his or her spouse and
(ii) that individual occupies or continues to occupy the property as his or her
permanent residence.
(3) The owner ceases to use the property as a permanent residence.
(j) Gap in Deferral. – If an owner of a residence on which taxes have been deferred under
this section is not eligible for continued deferral for a tax year, the deferred taxes are carried
forward and are not due and payable until a disqualifying event occurs. If the owner of the
residence qualifies for deferral after one or more years in which he or she did not qualify for
deferral and a disqualifying event occurs, the years in which the owner did not qualify are
disregarded in determining the preceding three years for which the deferred taxes are due and
payable.
(k) Repealed by Session Laws 2008-35, s. 1.2, effective July 1, 2008.
(l) Creditor Limitations. – A mortgagee or trustee that elects to pay any tax deferred by
the owner of a residence subject to a mortgage or deed of trust does not acquire a right to foreclose
as a result of the election. Except for requirements dictated by federal law or regulation, any
provision in a mortgage, deed of trust, or other agreement that prohibits the owner from deferring
taxes on property under this section is void.
(m) Construction. – This section does not affect the attachment of a lien for personal
property taxes against a tax-deferred residence.
(n) Application. – An application for property tax relief provided by this section should
be filed during the regular listing period, but may be filed and must be accepted at any time up
to and through June 1 preceding the tax year for which the relief is claimed. Persons may apply
for this property tax relief by entering the appropriate information on a form made available by
the assessor under G.S. 105-282.1."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 105-282.1(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(3) Triennial application required. – An owner of a property eligible for the
property tax homestead circuit breaker under G.S. 105-277.1B must file an
application for the benefit to receive it. Once the application has been
approved, the owner is entitled to the benefit for the current tax year and the
two subsequent tax years thereafter unless the property loses its eligibility for
the benefit as a result of a disqualifying event under G.S. 105-277.1B(i)."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 105-277.1F(a)(2) is repealed.
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 105-365.1(a)(3) is repealed.
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 153A-148.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-148.1. Disclosure of certain information prohibited.
(a) Disclosure Prohibited. – Notwithstanding Chapter 132 of the General Statutes or any
other law regarding access to public records, local tax records that contain information about a
taxpayer's income or receipts are not public records. A current or former officer, employee, or
House Bill 1181-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
agent of a county who in the course of service to or employment by the county has access to
information about the amount of a taxpayer's income or receipts may not disclose the information
to any other person unless the disclosure is made for one of the following purposes:
…
(6) To include on a property tax receipt the amount of property taxes due and the
amount of property taxes deferred on a residence classified under
G.S. 105-277.1B, the property tax homestead circuit breaker.
…."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 160A-208.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-208.1. Disclosure of certain information prohibited.
(a) Disclosure Prohibited. – Notwithstanding Chapter 132 of the General Statutes or any
other law regarding access to public records, local tax records that contain information about a
taxpayer's income or receipts are not public records. A current or former officer, employee, or
agent of a city who in the course of service to or employment by the city has access to information
about the amount of a taxpayer's income or receipts may not disclose the information to any other
person unless the disclosure is made for one of the following purposes:
…
(4) To include on a property tax receipt the amount of property taxes due and the
amount of property taxes deferred on a residence classified under
G.S. 105-277.1B, the property tax homestead circuit breaker.
…."
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 105-380 and G.S. 105-381, the governing body
of a taxing unit shall release the unpaid deferred taxes under G.S. 105-277.1B on any property
for which a disqualifying event has not occurred. Any lien under G.S. 105-355(a) corresponding
to the released deferred taxes is also extinguished.
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Association of County Commissioners (Association) the nonrecurring sum of twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used by the Association to provide
grants to local governments for the purpose of transitioning those governments to shortened
reappraisal cycles and thereby ensuring more frequent and accurate property valuations and to
educate the general public on property taxes and property tax relief programs offered by the State.
Grant funds provided under this section shall be used by local governments for (i) technical
assistance, (ii) public education regarding the property tax system and property tax relief
programs, and (iii) one-time capital investments in technological infrastructure that improve local
capacity and efficiency in conducting reappraisals, including the acquisition of specialized
software, data migration, and the implementation of digital systems. In awarding grants under
this section, the Association shall prioritize awarding grants to local governments operating on a
reappraisal cycle of more than four years. For purposes of this section, "local governments"
means counties, cities, or towns conducting reappraisals of property under Subchapter II of
Chapter 105 of the General Statutes as of the effective date of this section.
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.(a) Subchapter I of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Article to read:
"Article 8F.
"Excise Tax on Controlling Interest Transfers.
"§ 105-228.40. Purpose and scope.
The tax imposed by this Article is intended to ensure parity in the taxation of real property
transfers, whether such transfer is accomplished by the recordation of a deed or by the transfer
of a controlling interest in an entity that owns an interest in real property in this State.
"§ 105-228.41. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
Page 4 House Bill 1181-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Controlling interest. – Either of the following:
a. In the case of a corporation, either more than fifty percent (50%) of
the total combined voting power of all classes of stock of such
corporation, or more than fifty percent (50%) of the capital, profits, or
beneficial interest in the voting stock of such corporation.
b. In the case of a partnership, association, trust, or other entity, more
than fifty percent (50%) of the capital, profits, or beneficial interest in
such partnership, association, trust, or other entity.
(2) Entity. – A corporation, partnership, association, trust, limited liability
company, or other organization.
(3) Real property interest. – Any interest in real property located in this State.
(4) Value. – The fair market value, including any stated consideration
corresponding to thereto, of the real property interest owned by the entity.
There is a rebuttable presumption that the value is the higher of (i) the total
assessed ad valorem tax value of the property at the time of the transfer or (ii)
the prior purchasing price of the property if the purchase occurred within five
years of the transfer.
"§ 105-228.42. Imposition of excise tax; rate.
(a) Imposition. – An excise tax is levied on the sale or transfer, by one or more persons
or by one or more transactions, within any 36-month period, of a controlling interest in an entity
that possesses, directly or indirectly, a real property interest in the State. This tax applies if the
value of the real property interest exceeds one hundred dollars ($100.00).
(b) Rate. – The tax rate is one dollar ($1.00) on each five hundred dollars ($500.00), or
fractional part thereof, of the value of the real property interest.
"§ 105-228.43. Reporting and payment; duties of Register of Deeds.
(a) Report and Payment. – Every person who acquires a controlling interest in an entity
subject to this Article shall, within 30 days of the transfer, file a return with the Register of Deeds
in each county where the entity holds a real property interest. The tax must be paid at the time
the return is filed.
(b) Recording. – Upon payment of the tax, the Register of Deeds shall record a "Notice
of Controlling Interest Transfer" in the consolidated real property index. This notice shall not be
required to be a deed but shall serve as public notice of the satisfaction of the tax liability under
this Article.
"§ 105-228.44. Exemptions.
The tax imposed by this Article does not apply to the following:
(1) Transfers of an interest in an entity that is traded on a public stock exchange.
(2) Transfers resulting from death, whether by will or statutory succession.
(3) Transfers between spouses.
(4) Transfers that are exempt under G.S. 105-228.29 except transfers by "merger"
under subdivision (7) of that section.
"§ 105-228.45. Penalties.
(a) Failure to File. – Any person required to file a return under this Article who fails to
do so within the time required shall be subject to a penalty equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of
the tax due.
(b) Fraud. – Any person who willfully provides false information regarding the value of
the property or the percentage of interest transferred is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor."
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective January 1, 2027, and applies to
transfers occurring on or after that date.
SECTION 5. Section 1 of this act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
July 1, 2027. Section 3 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. Except as otherwise provided,
the remainder of this act becomes effective July 1, 2027.
House Bill 1181-First Edition Page 5